South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3435.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) South Carolina gross income does not include compensation received in the form of gratuity or tip. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies to tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----